Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201460-4,147.01
Driver's record; disclosure of
convictions; requirements.

The department, a prosecutor, or a court must not
mask, defer imposition of judgment, or allow an individual to enter into a
diversion program that would prevent a CLP-commercial
learner's permit driver's conviction or commercial driver's license
driver's conviction for any violation, in any type of motor vehicle, of a
state or local traffic control law (except a parking violation) from appearing
on the driver's record, whether the driver was convicted for an offense committed
in the state where the driver is licensed or another state.

Laws 2005, LB 76, § 16;

Laws 2014, LB983, § 35.